Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 14 Contamination of Drinking Water

46-14-1.
Contamination of drinking water sources prohibited.

Bathing, swimming, discharge of any sewage or drainage or refuse or polluting matter which may pollute or corrupt or impair the purity or quality of a public drinking water supply or which renders the water supply injurious to health or poses a potential significant risk to public health and any activity which leads to such discharge in, or on, or in the immediate vicinity of any water body used as a source of public drinking water supply shall be prohibited. In addition, any other activity in or on or in the immediate vicinity of any water body used as a source of public drinking water supply which the director of the department of health deems to render the water supply injurious to health or to pose a potential significant risk to public health shall be prohibited or restricted. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be penalized pursuant to the provisions of §

46-14-8

. The prohibition against bathing shall not apply to any camp or bathing resort located on a known tributary of any of the above-mentioned waters if such camp or bathing resort was licensed by the department of health prior to June 20, 1968.

History of Section.

P.L. 1897, ch. 491, § 1; P.L. 1904, ch. 1178, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 683, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 165, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 635, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

46-14-1

; P.L. 1964, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 73, § 1.

46-14-2.
Order to remove polluting matter from premises.

The director of health, when satisfied that any sewage, drainage, refuse, or polluting matter exists in a locality such that there is danger that the sewage, drainage, refuse, or polluting matter may pollute, or corrupt, or impair the purity or quality of any of the waters described in §

46-14-1

or render them injurious to health, or pose a potential significant risk to public health may order the owner or occupant of the premises where the sewage, drainage, refuse, or polluting matter exists, to remove the same from the premises or to take such other steps as the director may deem necessary and within such time after the serving of the notice prescribed in §

46-14-3

as the director may designate; and if the owner or occupant neglects or refuses to do so he or she shall be penalized pursuant to §

46-14-8

.

The provision of this section shall not interfere with nor prevent the enriching of land for agricultural purposes by the owner or occupant thereof, if no human excrement is used thereon, and no pollution, corruption, or impairment of the purity or quality of any of the waters described in §

46-14-1

results, and if the waters are not rendered injurious to health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1897, ch. 491, § 2; P.L. 1904, ch. 1178, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 118, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 165, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 635, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

46-14-2

; P.L. 1968, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 48, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 73, § 1.

46-14-2.1.
Contamination of private well — Notice to municipal water supply agency.

Any state department or agency which discovers or receives information that a private well or water supply has become contaminated, which contamination may pose a potential danger to the local public water supply, shall, upon receipt of the information, provide written notification to the local public water supply agency and the chief executive officer of the city or town where the well is located of the potential contamination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 357, § 1.

46-14-2.2.
Contamination of local water supply — Notice to city or town.

If the state department of health discovers that a water supply to a municipality has become contaminated, which contamination may pose a potential danger to the public, the director of health shall, within forty-eight (48) hours of the discovery of the contamination, notify the city or town council of every city and town whose water supply is affected by the contamination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 47.

46-14-3.
Service of notice.

The notice shall be in writing, signed by the director of health or the person performing the duties of that official, and shall be served by any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or constable by reading the notice in the presence or hearing of the owner, occupant, or his or her authorized agent, or by leaving a copy of the notice in the hands or possession of, or at the last and usual place of abode of, the owner, occupant, or agent if within this state; provided, however, that if the owner, occupant, or agent is a corporation incorporated in this state, the notice shall be served by leaving a copy thereof at the last and usual place of abode of the president or person performing the duties of president of the corporation. But if the premises are unoccupied, or the residence of the owner is unknown or without this state, or if the owner is a corporation incorporated without this state, the notice may be served by posting a copy of the notice on the premises and by advertising the notice in some newspaper published in Providence County in such manner and for such length of time as the director of health may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1897, ch. 491, § 3; P.L. 1904, ch. 1178, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 118, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 165, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 635, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

46-14-3

.

46-14-4.
Prosecutions of violations — Liability for costs.

The director of health, the commissioner of environmental management or the director of the department of environmental management until such time as the governor provides by executive order for the actual transfer of functions from the department of environmental management to the department of the environment pursuant to the provisions of § 42-17.1-40, the chief of police of any city or town in which a violation of this chapter occurs, or the president of the town council of any town, or the mayor of any city, or the executive officer of any district, institution, or company whose water supply is involved, is authorized to prosecute all violations of this chapter and shall not be required to give surety for costs upon complaints he or she enters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1897, ch. 491, § 4; P.L. 1904, ch. 1178, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 118, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 165, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 635, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

46-14-4

; P.L. 1968, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 48, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 73, § 1.

46-14-5.
Judicial aid in enforcement.

The superior court, upon the application of the director of health, or the commissioner of environmental management or the director of the department of environmental management until such time as the governor provides by executive order for the actual transfer of functions from the department of environmental management to the department of the environment pursuant to the provisions of § 42-17.1-40, or the chief of police of any city or town in which a violation of this chapter occurs, or the president of the town council of any town, or the mayor of any city or the executive officer of any district, institution, or company whose water supply is involved in that violation, shall have jurisdiction in equity to enjoin the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter and to enforce the orders of the director made pursuant thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1897, ch. 491, § 5; P.L. 1904, ch. 1178, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 118, § 5; P.L. 1911, ch. 683, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 165, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 635, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

46-14-5

; P.L. 1964, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 48, § 4; P.L. 1991, ch. 73, § 1.

46-14-6.
Inspection of premises.

In order to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the director of health shall have the power to go upon the premises of any person for the purpose of inspection.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

46-14-6

; P.L. 1964, ch. 108, § 2.

46-14-7.
Repealed.

46-14-8.
Penalties.

Civil penalty. Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day during which the violation occurs.

Criminal penalty.

Any person who shall be found guilty of violating, willfully or with criminal negligence, any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any rule, or regulation issued pursuant thereto, or an order of the director, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment, and every person shall be deemed guilty of a separate and distinct offense for each day during which the violation shall be repeated or continued.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter or by any rule, regulation, or order issued under this chapter or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this chapter, or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under this chapter, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each instance of violation or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 73, § 2.

46-14-9.
Rules and regulations.

The director of the department of health may promulgate such rules and regulations as shall be deemed necessary to effect the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 73, § 2.